ro-RO: Tehnologie de extracție: Dermaplaning; Electric de înaltă frecvență; Terapie cu lumină LED; Buclă manuală; Ac manual; Microdermoabraziune; Vibrație ultrasonică; Aspirare cu vacuum; Altele
en: Extraction technology: Dermaplaning; High-frequency electrical; LED light therapy; Manual loop; Manual needle; Microdermabrasion; Ultrasonic vibration; Vacuum suction; Other
ru: Технология экстракции: Дермапланинг; Высокочастотный электрический; LED-светотерапия; Ручная петля; Ручная игла; Микродермабразия; Ультразвуковая вибрация; Вакуумная экстракция; Другой
pt-PT: Tecnologia de extração: Dermaplaning; Elétrico de alta frequência; Terapia de luz LED; Laço manual; Agulha manual; Microdermoabrasão; Vibração ultrassónica; Sucção a vácuo; Outro
ko: 추출 기술: 더마플레이닝; 고주파 전기; LED 라이트 테라피; 수동 루프; 수동 니들; 미세박피술; 초음파 진동; 진공 흡입; 기타
lt-LT: Ekstrakcijos technologija: Dermaplanavimas; Aukšto dažnio elektrinis; LED šviesos terapija; Rankinė kilpa; Rankinė adata; Mikrodermabrazija; Ultragarsinė vibracija; Vakuuminis siurbimas; Kita
nb: Ekstraksjonsteknikk: Dermaplaning; Høyfrekvent elektrisk; LED-lysterapi; Manuell løkke; Manuell nål; Mikrodermasjon; Ultralydvibrasjon; Vakuumsug; Annet
hu: Kiszedési technológia: Dermaplaning; Nagyfrekvenciás elektromos; LED fényterápia; Kézi hurok; Kézi tű; Mikrodermabrázió; Ultrahangos vibráció; Vákuumos szívás; Egyéb
zh-TW: 清除技術: 皮膚刨削; 高頻電流; LED 光療; 手動環型; 手動針型; 微晶磨皮; 超音波震動; 真空吸取; 其他
fi: Uuttoteknologia: Dermaplaning; Korkeataajuussähkö; LED-valoterapia; Manuaalinen silmukka; Manuaalinen neula; Mikrodermabrasio; Ultraäänivärähtely; Tyhjiöimu; Muu
hr-HR: Tehnologija ekstrakcije: Dermaplaning; Visokofrekventna električna; LED svjetlosna terapija; Ručna petlja; Ručna igla; Mikrodermoabrazija; Ultrazvučne vibracije; Vakuumsko usisavanje; Ostalo
vi: Công nghệ hút: Lột da; Điện tần số cao; Liệu pháp ánh sáng LED; Vòng thủ công; Kim thủ công; Mài da vi điểm; Rung siêu âm; Hút chân không; Khác
ja: 抽出技術: ダーマプレーニング; 高周波電気; LEDライトセラピー; 手動ループ; 手動ニードル; マイクロダーマブレーション; 超音波振動; バキューム吸引; その他
pl: Technologia ekstrakcji: Dermaplaning; Wysokiej częstotliwości elektryczny; Terapia światłem LED; Ręczna pętla; Ręczna igła; Mikrodermabrazja; Wibracje ultradźwiękowe; Ssanie próżniowe; Inne
de: Extraktionstechnologie: Dermaplaning; Hochfrequenz-Elektrik; LED-Lichttherapie; Manuelle Schlaufe; Manuelle Nadel; Mikrodermabrasion; Ultraschallvibration; Vakuumsaugung; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Технология за екстракция: Дермапланиране; Високочестотна електрическа; LED светлинна терапия; Ръчна примка; Ръчна игла; Микродермабразио; Ултразвукова вибрация; Вакуумно засмукване; Други
zh-CN: 提取技术: 真皮刮削; 高频电疗; LED 光疗; 手动环形; 手动针式; 微晶磨皮; 超声波振动; 真空吸附; 其他
cs: Technologie extrakce: Dermaplaning; Vysokofrekvenční elektrická; LED světelná terapie; Ruční smyčka; Ruční jehla; Mikrodermabraze; Ultrazvukové vibrace; Vakuové sání; Jiné
da: Ekstraktionsteknologi: Dermaplaning; Højfrekvent elektrisk; LED-lysterapi; Manuel løkke; Manuel nål; Mikrodermabrasion; Ultralydsvibration; Vakuumsugning; Andet
tr: Ekstraksiyon teknolojisi: Dermaplaning; Yüksek frekanslı elektrik; LED ışık terapisi; Manuel halka; Manuel iğne; Mikrodermabrazyon; Ultrasonik titreşim; Vakum emişi; Diğer
pt-BR: Tecnologia de extração: Dermaplaning; Elétrico de alta frequência; Terapia com luz LED; Argola manual; Agulha manual; Microdermoabrasão; Vibração ultrassônica; Sucção a vácuo; Outro
es: Tecnología de extracción: Dermaplaning; Eléctrica de alta frecuencia; Terapia de luz LED; Aro manual; Aguja manual; Microdermoabrasión; Vibración ultrasónica; Succión al vacío; Otros
nl: Extractietechnologie: Dermaplaning; Hoogfrequente elektrische; LED-lichttherapie; Handmatige lus; Handmatige naald; Microdermabrasie; Ultrasone trillingen; Vacuümzuiging; Andere
fr: Technologie d’extraction: Dermaplaning; Haute fréquence électrique; Thérapie par lumière LED; Boucle manuelle; Aiguille manuelle; Microdermabrasion; Vibration ultrasonique; Aspiration par vide; Autre
sk-SK: Extrakčná technológia: Dermaplánovanie; Vysokofrekvenčná elektrická; LED svetelná terapia; Manuálna slučka; Manuálna ihla; Mikrodermabrázia; Ultrazvukové vibrácie; Vákuové odsávanie; Iné
el: Τεχνολογία εξαγωγής: Δερμοαπόξεση; Ηλεκτρικό υψηλής συχνότητας; Θεραπεία με φως LED; Χειροκίνητη θηλιά; Χειροκίνητη βελόνα; Μικροδερμοαπόξεση; Υπερηχητική δόνηση; Αναρρόφηση κενού; Άλλο
it: Tecnologia di estrazione: Dermaplaning; Elettrico ad alta frequenza; Terapia con luce LED; Anello manuale; Ago manuale; Microdermoabrasione; Vibrazione ultrasonica; Aspirazione a vuoto; Altro
sv: Extraktionsteknologi: Dermaplaning; Högfrekvent elektrisk; LED-ljusterapi; Manuell slinga; Manuell nål; Mikrodermabrasion; Ultraljudsvibration; Vakuumsugning; Övrigt
th: เทคโนโลยีการสกัด: การโกนขนหน้า; ไฟฟ้าความถี่สูง; บำบัดด้วยแสง LED; ห่วงแบบใช้มือ; เข็มแบบใช้มือ; ไมโครเดอร์มาเบรชัน; คลื่นอัลตราโซนิก; ดูดสุญญากาศ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Tehnologija ekstrakcije: Dermaplaning; Visokofrekvečna električna; LED svetlobna terapija; Ročna zanka; Ročna igla; Mikrodermoabrazija; Ultrazvočne vibracije; Vakuumsko sesanje; Drugo